Massachusetts, session 194th, H3181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Closing Cost,” any expenses associated with a mortgage beyond the down payment,
including appraisal fees, mortgage generation fees, bank fees, mortgage generation fees, bank
fees, recording fees, inspection fees, attorney fees and escrow fees.
“First-time homebuyer,” a Massachusetts resident who has not owned a home at any
point in the last three years.
Section 2: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary there shall be a
deduction associated with first time homebuyers valued at the cost of any additional closing costs
accrued through the homebuying process.
of 1